Vermont, session 2025-2026, H809.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Intent * * *
Sec. 1. INTENT
With the repeal of portions of 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, it is the
intent of the General Assembly to transform Vermont’s education governance
system by:
(1) building upon the work of 2015 Acts and Resolves No. 46 by
identifying the characteristics of Vermont’s preferred education governance
structure or structures and incentivizing school districts to voluntarily merge
into larger school districts that satisfy the identified characteristics;
(2) leveraging the economies of scale and efficiencies that may be
provided through the use of boards of cooperative education services (BOCEs)
by creating five to 10 BOCEs that provide membership for each supervisory
union in Vermont; and
(3) adding the construction of regional high schools to the list of high-
priority funding areas in the State Aid for School Construction Program
operated pursuant to 16 V.S.A. chapter 123.
* * * Act 73 Repeals * * *
Sec. 2. ACT 73 REPEALS
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 3 of 20
The following sections of 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73 are repealed on
passage:
(1) Sec. 1 (findings; intent; plan);
(2) Sec. 2 (Commission on the Future of Public Education);
(3) Sec. 3 (School District Redistricting Task Force);
(4) Sec. 4 (School District Voting Ward Working Group);
(5) Sec. 5 (scale; intent);
(6) Sec. 6 (prospective amendment to 16 V.S.A. § 165; class size
minimums);
(7) Sec. 7 (failure to comply with class size minimums);
(8) Sec. 8 (SBE rules; report);
(9) Sec. 9 (AOE report; school calendar; graduation requirements);
(10) Sec. 10 (SBE rule review; appropriation);
(11) Sec. 23 (state-level governance; intent);
(12) Sec. 27 (prospective amendments to 16 V.S.A. § 823);
(13) Sec. 28 (prospective tuition repeals);
(14) Sec. 28a (State Board of Education tuition fee rules);
(15) Sec. 29 (special education report);
(16) Sec. 30 (AOE special education strategic plan);
(17) Sec. 31 (AOE position);
(18) Sec. 32 (AOE transformation support);
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 4 of 20
(19) Sec. 33 (AOE positions);
(20) Secs. 34–43 (transition to cost-factor foundation formula);
(21) Sec. 44 (transportation reimbursement guidelines);
(22) Sec. 45 (inflationary measures; prekindergarten; reports);
(23) Sec. 45a (foundation formula report);
(24) Sec. 45b (educational opportunity payment transition);
(25) Secs. 46, 47, 49, and 50 (statewide education tax; supplemental
district spending tax);
(26) Sec. 46a (supplemental district spending tax; cap; transition);
(27) Sec. 48 (prospective amendments to December 1 letter);
(28) Sec. 48a (tax rate transition);
(29) Secs. 51, 52, and 54–56 (property tax credit repeal; creation of
homestead exemption);
(30) Sec. 53 (homestead exemption report);
(31) Sec. 57 (Education Fund Advisory Committee; review of
foundation formula);
(32) Secs. 60 and 61 (property tax classifications);
(33) Sec. 61a (tax classifications transition);
(34) Sec. 61b (property tax classifications implementation report);
(35) Sec. 61c (tax classifications intent); and
(36) Sec. 61d (prospective repeal).
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 5 of 20
Sec. 3. 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 70 is amended to read:
Sec. 70. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and the following sections shall take effect on passage:
(1) Sec. 1 (findings; intent; plan); [Deleted.]
(2) Sec. 2 (Commission on the Future of Public Education); [Deleted.]
(3) Sec. 3 (School District Redistricting Task Force); [Deleted.]
(4) Sec. 4 (School District Voting Ward Working Group); [Deleted.]
(5) Sec. 28a (State Board of Education tuition fee rules); [Deleted.]
(6) Sec. 32 (Agency of Education transformation support); [Deleted.]
(7) Sec. 33 (Agency of Education positions); [Deleted.]
(8) Sec. 44 (transportation reimbursement guidelines); [Deleted.]
(9) Sec. 45 (inflationary measures; prekindergarten; reports); [Deleted.]
(10) Sec. 45a (foundation formula report); [Deleted.]
(11) Sec. 45c (Education Fund Advisory Committee; delay);
(12) Sec. 53 (homestead exemption report); [Deleted.]
(13) Sec. 61b (property tax classifications implementation report);
[Deleted.]
(14) Sec. 61c (tax classifications intent); [Deleted.]
(15) Sec. 61d (prospective repeal); [Deleted.]
(16) Sec. 63 (regional assessment district transition; progress report);
(17) Sec. 64 (RAD stakeholder working group);
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 6 of 20
(18) Sec. 65 (inadvertently removed language);
(19) Sec. 66 (minimum debt for tax sales);
(20) Sec. 68 (property tax credit late fee); and
(21) Sec. 69 (statewide adjustment correction).
(b) The following sections shall take effect on July 1, 2025:
(1) Sec. 5 (scale; intent); [Deleted.]
(2) Sec. 8 (SBE rules; report); [Deleted.]
(3) Sec. 9 (AOE report; school calendar; graduation requirements);
[Deleted.]
(4) Sec. 10 (SBE rule review; appropriation); [Deleted.]
(5) Sec. 14 (16 V.S.A. § 3443);
(6) Sec. 15 (School Construction Advisory Board sunset);
(7) Sec. 21 (16 V.S.A. § 828);
(8) Sec. 22 (tuition transition);
(9) Sec. 23 (state-level governance; intent); [Deleted.]
(10) Sec. 24 (16 V.S.A. § 161);
(11) Sec. 25 (SBE appointments transition);
(12) Sec. 26 (16 V.S.A. § 162); and
(13) Sec. 29 (special education report); [Deleted.]
(14) Sec. 30 (AOE special education strategic plan); [Deleted.]
(15) Sec. 31 (AOE position); and [Deleted.]
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 7 of 20
(16) Sec. 67 (PVR hearing officer pay).
(c) The following sections shall take effect on July 1, 2026:
(1) Sec. 6 (class size minimums); [Deleted.]
(2) Sec. 7 (failure to comply with class size minimums); [Deleted.]
(3) Sec. 12 (school construction policy);
(4) Sec. 13 (16 V.S.A. § 3442);
(5) Sec. 16 (16 V.S.A. § 3444);
(6) Sec. 17 (16 V.S.A. § 3445);
(7) Sec. 18 (16 V.S.A. § 3446);
(8) Sec. 19 (transfer of rulemaking authority); and
(9) Sec. 20 (repeals).
(d) Sec. 48 (December 1 letter) shall take effect on July 1, 2027. [Deleted.]
(e) Sec. 61a shall take effect on January 1, 2027, provided that the General
Assembly has enacted new school district boundaries between the enactment
of this act and January 1, 2027. [Deleted.]
(f) The following sections shall take effect on July 1, 2028, provided that
the new school districts contemplated by this act have assumed responsibility
for the education of all resident students and that the expert tasked with
developing a cost-factor foundation formula has provided to the General
Assembly the report pursuant to Sec. 45a to provide the General Assembly an
opportunity to enact legislation in consideration of the report:
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 8 of 20
(1) In Sec. 27, 16 V.S.A. § 823(a) and (d);
(2) Sec. 28 (tuition repeals);
(3) Secs. 34–43 (transition to cost-factor foundation formula);
(4) Sec. 45b (educational opportunity payment transition);
(5) Secs. 46, 47, 49, and 50 (statewide education tax; supplemental
district spending tax);
(6) Sec. 46a (supplemental district spending tax; cap; transition);
(7) Sec. 48a (tax rate transition);
(8) Secs. 51, 52, and 54–56 (property tax credit repeal; creation of
homestead exemption);
(9) Sec. 57 (Education Fund Advisory Committee; review of foundation
formula); and
(10) Secs. 60 and 61 (property tax classifications). [Deleted.]
(g) In Sec. 27, 16 V.S.A. § 823(b) and (c) shall take effect on July 1, 2028,
provided that the new school districts contemplated by this act have assumed
responsibility for the education of all resident students and that the cost-factor
foundation formula report required pursuant to Sec. 45a contains evidence that
it costs more to educate students in grades nine through 12 but the General
Assembly has failed to enact legislation to add a secondary student weight.
[Deleted.]
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 9 of 20
(h) Sec. 62 (regional assessment districts) shall take effect on January 1,
2029.
* * * Tuition to Approved Schools * * *
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 828 is amended to read:
§ 828. TUITION TO APPROVED SCHOOLS; AGE; APPEAL
(a) A school district shall not pay the tuition of a student except to:
(1) a public school located in Vermont;
(2) an approved independent school that:
(A) is located in Vermont;
(B) is approved under section 166 of this title on or before July 1,
2025;
(C) is located within either:
(i) a supervisory district that does not operate a public school for
some or all grades as of July 1, 2024; or
(ii) a supervisory union with one or more member school districts
that does not operate a public school for some or all grades as of July 1, 2024;
and
(D) had at least 25 51 percent of its student enrollment composed of
students attending on a district-funded tuition basis pursuant to chapter 21 of
this title during the 2023–2024 school year; and
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 10 of 20
(E) complies with the minimum class size requirements contained in
subdivision 165(a)(9) of this title and State Board rule; provided, however, that
if a school is unable to comply with the class size minimum standards due to
geographic isolation or a school has developed an implementation plan to meet
the class size minimum requirements, the school may ask the State Board to
grant it a waiver from this subdivision (E), which decision shall be final;
[Repealed.]
* * *
* * * Property Tax Classifications * * *
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 4152a is added to read:
§ 4152a. PROPERTY TAX CLASSIFICATIONS
(a) The grand list of a town shall include one or more tax classifications for
each parcel of real estate. A parcel shall be classified using one of the general
classes of real estate listed under subsection (b) of this section and based on the
considerations set forth in this section and guidance provided by the Division
of Property Valuation and Review. The listers and assessors shall annually
update the grand list to include a tax classification not later than June 1 of
every year, using information submitted to the Department of Taxes pursuant
to this section. The tax classification may be updated after June 1 when a
taxpayer files a, or corrects an erroneously filed, homestead declaration after
June 1.
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 11 of 20
(b) A parcel shall be assigned one or more of the following general classes:
(1) homestead;
(2) nonhomestead nonresidential;
(3) nonhomestead residential; and
(4) nonhomestead seasonal.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Homestead” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel, declared as a
homestead on or before October 15 in accordance with section 5410 of this
title for the current year.
(2) “Nonhomestead nonresidential” means a parcel, or portion of a
parcel, that does not qualify as “homestead” or “nonhomestead residential”
under this section.
(3) “Nonhomestead residential” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel,
for which a homestead was not declared in accordance with section 5410 of
this title for the current year and that has a residential property, as defined by
the Commissioner by rule.
(4) “Nonhomestead seasonal” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel, that
would qualify as “nonhomestead residential,” except the parcel has no
residential property fit for habitation on a year-round basis. The
Commissioner shall adopt rules further defining residential property fit for
habitation on a year-round basis.
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 12 of 20
(d) A parcel with two or more portions qualifying for different tax
classifications under this section shall be classified proportionally based on the
percentage of floor space used.
(1) In the case of a homestead with 25 percent or less of floor space used
for a business purpose, the parcel shall be classified as a homestead pursuant to
subdivision 5401(7)(F) of this title.
(2) If a portion of floor space is used for more than one purpose, the use
for which the floor space is most often used shall be considered the primary
use, and the floor space shall be dedicated to that use for purposes of tax
classification.
(e) The Commissioner shall amend existing forms, and publish new forms,
as needed to gather the necessary attestations and declarations required under
this section.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the tax treatment or
enrollment eligibility of property as it relates to use value appraisal under
chapter 124 of this title.
(g) Persons aggrieved by a decision to classify property for taxation
purposes under this section may appeal in the manner provided for property
valuation appeals under this title.
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 13 of 20
Sec. 6. 32 V.S.A. § 4152 is amended to read:
§ 4152. CONTENTS
(a) When completed, the grand list of a town shall be in such form as the
Director prescribes and shall contain such information as the Director
prescribes, including:
(1) In alphabetical order, the name of each real property owner and each
owner of taxable personal property.
(2) The last known mailing address of all such owners.
(3) A brief description of each parcel of taxable real estate in the town,
including a classification assigned pursuant to section 4152a of this title.
“Parcel” As used in this subdivision, “parcel” means a separate and sellable lot
or piece of real estate. Parcels may be combined to represent all contiguous
land in the same ownership, together with all improvements thereon.
* * *
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 5402 is amended to read:
§ 5402. EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX LIABILITY
(a) A statewide education tax is imposed on all nonhomestead and
homestead property at the following rates:
(1) The tax rate for nonhomestead nonresidential and nonhomestead
seasonal property shall be $1.59 per $100.00 divided by the statewide
adjustment.
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 14 of 20
(2) The tax rate for homestead property shall be $1.00 multiplied by the
education property tax spending adjustment for the municipality per $100.00 of
equalized education property value as most recently determined under section
5405 of this title. The homestead property tax rate for each municipality that is
a member of a union or unified union school district shall be calculated as
required under subsection (e) of this section.
(3) The tax rate for nonhomestead residential property shall be $2.00
multiplied by the education property tax spending adjustment for the
municipality per $100.00 of equalized education property value as most
recently determined under section 5405 of this title. The Commissioner of
Taxes shall determine a nonhomestead residential education tax rate for each
municipality that is a member of a union or unified union school district using
the same process as is used for homesteads under subsection (e) of this section.
Nonhomestead residential property shall use the same property dollar
equivalent yield as homesteads in the same municipality.
* * *
Sec. 8. 32 V.S.A. § 5402b is amended to read:
§ 5402b. STATEWIDE EDUCATION TAX YIELDS;
RECOMMENDATION OF THE COMMISSIONER
(a) Annually, not later than December 1, the Commissioner of Taxes, after
consultation with the Secretary of Education, the Secretary of Administration,
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 15 of 20
and the Joint Fiscal Office, shall calculate and recommend a property dollar
equivalent yield, an income dollar equivalent yield, and a nonhomestead
property tax rate for the following fiscal year. In making these calculations,
the Commissioner shall assume:
* * *
(4) the percentage change in the average education tax bill applied to
nonhomestead nonresidential property and, the percentage change in the
average education tax bill applied to nonhomestead seasonal property, the
percentage change in the average education tax bill applied to nonhomestead
residential property, the percentage change in the average education tax bill of
homestead property, and the percentage change in the average education tax
bill for taxpayers who claim a credit under subsection 6066(a) of this title are
equal;
* * *
Sec. 9. PROPERTY TAX CLASSIFICATIONS; TRANSITION; DATA
COLLECTION
(a) For calendar year 2027, the Commissioner of Taxes shall amend and
create forms so that taxpayers report information on the use of their property
for such property to be classified as homestead, nonhomestead residential,
nonhomestead nonresidential, or nonhomestead seasonal, or a proportional
classification of those uses. The information collected, and classifications
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 16 of 20
determined, shall align with the definitions and requirements of Sec. 1 of this
act. The Commissioner shall use the information to determine and assign a tax
classification for every grand list parcel and, on or before October 1, 2027, the
Commissioner shall provide that information to the Joint Fiscal Office.
(b) On or before August 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Taxes shall publish
guidance that interprets and explains the statutory definitions from Sec. 1 of
this act, which shall serve as the Department’s official interpretation until the
Commissioner adopts rules relating to the property classification system
created by this act.
* * * Study Committee on Ideal Class Size Ranges * * *
Sec. 10. STUDY COMMITTEE ON IDEAL CLASS SIZE RANGES;
REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Study Committee on Ideal Class Size
Ranges to examine and recommend evidence-based class size ranges for
Vermont public schools. The Committee shall study and make
recommendations regarding optimal class size ranges by grade level and
instructional context in order to:
(1) improve student academic outcomes and well-being;
(2) support effective instruction, including for students with disabilities,
multilingual learners, and students experiencing poverty;
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 17 of 20
(3) account for Vermont’s rural school context and varying school sizes;
(4) consider fiscal sustainability and workforce availability; and
(5) promote equity and consistency while preserving appropriate local
flexibility.
(b) Membership. The Committee shall consist of nine members who, to the
extent practicable, reflect Vermont’s geographic diversity and include
representation from rural and small schools and who shall be appointed as
follows:
(1) three classroom teachers, representing elementary, middle, and
secondary levels, appointed by the Vermont-National Education Association;
(2) two school administrators, one principal and one superintendent,
appointed by the Vermont Principals’ Association and the Vermont
Superintendents Association, respectively;
(3) one school board member, appointed by the Vermont School Boards
Association;
(4) one member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the
Speaker of the House, who shall be a member of the House Committee on
Education;
(5) one member of the Senate, appointed by the Committee on
Committees, who shall be a member of the Senate Committee on Education;
and
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 18 of 20
(6) one representative of the Agency of Education, appointed by the
Secretary of Education.
(c) Powers and Duties. The Committee shall:
(1) review current research on class size and student outcomes,
including differentiated impacts by grade level and student population;
(2) analyze current class size practices across Vermont supervisory
unions and school districts;
(3) consider alternative staffing models, including team teaching and
instructional aides;
(4) evaluate the fiscal and workforce implications of various class size
ranges;
(5) identify circumstances in which deviations from recommended
ranges may be appropriate; and
(6) develop recommended class size ranges by grade band and
instructional setting.
(d) Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Agency of Education.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2027, the Committee shall submit a
written report to the House and Senate Committees on Education with
recommended class size ranges by grade band and instructional context. The
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 19 of 20
report shall include the evidence and research the Committee relied upon in
making its final recommendations.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The member appointed by the Secretary of Education shall call the
first meeting of the Committee to occur on or before August 15, 2026.
(2) The Committee shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Committee shall cease to exist on January 31, 2027.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Committee serving in the member’s
capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than six
meetings. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
General Assembly.
(2) Other members of the Committee shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010 for not more than six meetings. These payments shall be made from
monies appropriated to the Agency of Education.
VT LEG #386154 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.809
2026 Page 20 of 20
(h) Appropriation. The sum of $3,000.00 is appropriated to the Agency of
Education from the General Fund in fiscal year 2027 for per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses for members of the Committee.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section, Secs. 1–4 (intent; Act 73 repeals and updates), Sec. 9
(transition provisions), and Sec. 10 (Study Committee on Ideal Class Size
Ranges) shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 5–8 (new property tax classifications and rates) shall take effect
on January 1, 2028.
VT LEG #386154 v.3